Hawaii, session 2026, SB33.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to rename the department of business, economic development, and tourism to the department of housing, economic development, and tourism to clarify that the department's duties include the development of more housing in the State and to emphasize that the department shall place greater weight on its housing policy. SECTION 2.  Section 26-52, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§26-52  Department heads and executive officers.  The salaries of the following state officers shall be as follows: (1)  The salary of the superintendent of education shall be set by the board of education.  The superintendent shall be subject to an annual performance evaluation that is in alignment with other employee evaluations within the department of education and are based on outcomes determined by the board of education; provided that nothing shall prohibit the board of education from conditioning a portion of the salary on performance; (2)  The salary of the president of the university of Hawaii shall be set by the board of regents; (3)  Effective July 1, 2004, the salaries of all department heads or executive officers of the departments of accounting and general services; agriculture; the attorney general; budget and finance; [business,] housing, economic development, and tourism; commerce and consumer affairs; corrections and rehabilitation; Hawaiian home lands; health; human resources development; human services; labor and industrial relations; land and natural resources; law enforcement; taxation; and transportation shall be as last recommended by the executive salary commission.  Effective July 1, 2007, and every six years thereafter, the salaries shall be as last recommended by the commission on salaries pursuant to section 26-56, unless rejected by the legislature; and (4)  The salary of the adjutant general shall be $85,302 a year.  Effective July 1, 2007, and every six years thereafter, the salary of the adjutant general shall be as last recommended by the commission on salaries pursuant to section 26-56, unless rejected by the legislature, except that if the state salary is in conflict with the pay and allowance fixed by the tables of the regular Army or Air Force of the United States, the latter shall prevail." SECTION 3.  Section 26-56, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) The commission shall review and recommend an appropriate salary for the governor, lieutenant governor, members of the legislature, justices and judges of all state courts, administrative director of the State or an equivalent position, and department heads or executive officers and the deputies or assistants to the department heads of the departments of: (1)  Accounting and general services; (2)  Agriculture; (3)  The attorney general; (4)  Budget and finance; (5)  [Business,] Housing, economic development, and tourism; (6)  Commerce and consumer affairs; (7)  Corrections and rehabilitation; (8)  Defense; (9)  Hawaiian home lands; (10)  Health; (11)  Human resources development; (12)  Human services; (13)  Labor and industrial relations; (14)  Land and natural resources; (15)  Law enforcement; (16)  Taxation; and (17)  Transportation. The commission shall not review the salary of any position in the department of education or the University of Hawaii. The commission may recommend different salaries for department heads and executive officers and different salary ranges for deputies or assistants to department heads; provided that the commission shall recommend the same salary range for deputies or assistants to department heads within the same department; provided further that the appointing official shall specify the salary for a particular position within the applicable range. The commission shall not recommend salaries lower than salary amounts recommended by prior commissions replaced by this section." SECTION 4.  Section 194-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) The council shall be placed within the department of land and natural resources for administrative purposes only and shall be composed of: (1)  The president of the University of Hawaii, or the president's designated representative; (2)  The director, or the director's designated representative, of each of the following departments: (A)  [Business,] Housing, economic development, and tourism; (B)  Health; and (C)  Transportation; and (3)  The chairperson, or the chairperson's designated representative, of each of the following departments: (A)  Agriculture; and (B)  Land and natural resources." SECTION 5. Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title to read as follows: "CHAPTER 201 DEPARTMENT OF [BUSINESS,] HOUSING, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, AND TOURISM" SECTION 6. (a)  Sections 10-18, 23-12, 26-4, 26-18, 48-1, 48-2, 48-3, 48-4, 48-6, 76-16, 103D-903, 107-22, 109-1, 121-19, 125C-2, 125C-31, 132D-6, 163D-3, 171-42, 171-95.3, 174C-5, 189-21, 189-42, 196-1, 196-10, 196-10.5, 196-41, 196-61, 196-71, 201-1, 201-2, 201-2.5, 201-3, 201-3.5, 201-4, 201-6, 201-7, 201-8, 201-9, 201-10, 201-11, 201-12.8, 201-13, 201-16, 201-17, 201-18, 201-61, 201-81, 201-84, 201-101.5, 201-111, 201B-2, 201B-7.5, 201C-1, 201C-2, 201H-2, 201M-5, 202-10, 205-1, 205-3.1, 205A-62, 206E-3, 206E-32, 206E-34, 206E-221, 206E-225, 206E-244, 206M-2, 206M-3, 206R-1, 206R-2, 206S-1, 206S-2, 209E-2, 210-1, 210-6, 210-7, 210-8, 210D-2, 210D-5, 211D-1, 211E-1, 211E-3, 212-5.5, 212-10, 213-1, 225M-1, 225M-2, 226-63, 227D-2, 229-2, 235-17, 235-110.91, 269-45, 269-161, 302A-1314, 304A-1892, 342G-47, 342G-48, 342G-63, 342G-64, 371-17, 383-128, 394-9, 437-1.1, 445-112, 474-4, 486B-1.5, 486H-13, 486J-1, 486J-6, 486J-7, and 486J-21, Hawaii Revised Statutes, are amended by substituting the phrase "department of housing, economic development, and tourism", or similar term, wherever the phrase "department of business, economic development, and tourism", or similar term, appears, as the context requires. (b) Sections 26-16, 26-18, 27-44, 84-18, 109-1, 125C-32, 128E-2, 163D-3, 189-21, 189-42, 196-6.5, 196-61, 201-4, 201-5, 201-11, 201-101.5, 201-102, 201-103, 201-104, 201-115, 201B-2, 201B-13, 201C-4, 201H-2, 201H-3, 201M-5, 206E-3, 206J-4, 206M-2, 206S-4, 209-1, 209-26, 209-27, 209-29, 209-31, 209-32, 209-33, 209-34, 209E-2, 210-1, 210-2, 210-4, 210-6, 210D-5, 210D-10, 211E-4, 213-2, 225M-1, 225M-2, 225M-3, 225M-4, 225P-3, 227D-2, 279A-4, 302A-1314, 304A-3353, 346-382, and 486J-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, are amended by substituting the phrase "director of housing, economic development, and tourism", or similar term, wherever the phrase "director of business, economic development, and tourism", or similar term, appears, as the context requires. SECTION 7.  (a)  The revisor of statutes shall substitute the phrase "department of housing, economic development, and tourism", or similar term, wherever the phrase "department of business, economic development, and tourism", or similar term, appears in any Acts of the Sessions Laws of Hawaii 2025, as the context requires. (b)  The revisor of statutes shall substitute the phrase "director of housing, economic development, and tourism", or similar term, wherever the phrase "director of business, economic development, and tourism", or similar term, appears in any Acts of the Sessions Laws of Hawaii 2025, as the context requires. SECTION 8.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 9. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 10. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________